Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.736, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Limits. The total liability of the state and its employees acting within the scope of their employment on any tort claim shall not exceed: (a) $300,000 when the claim is one for death by wrongful act or omission and $300,000 to any claimant in any other case, for claims arising before August 1, 2007; (b) $400,000 when the claim is one for death by wrongful act or omission and $400,000 to any claimant in any other case, for claims arising on or after August 1, 2007, and before July 1, 2009; (c) $500,000 when the claim is one for death by wrongful act or omission and $500,000 to any claimant in any other case, for claims arising on or after July 1, 2009; (d) $750,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2000; (e) $1,000,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2008; (f) $1,200,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after January 1, 2008, and before July 1, 2009; (g) $1,500,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after July 1, 2009; or (h) $1,000,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, if the claim involves a nonprofit organization engaged in or administering outdoor recreational activities funded in whole or in part by the state deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end operating under the authorization of a permit issued by an agency or department of the statenew text begin , or operating pursuant to a no-cost contract with an agency or department of the state. For purposes of this subdivision, a "no-cost contract" is a contract between an agency or department of the state and a nonprofit organization where the nonprofit organization provides goods or services to the agency or department at no cost to the statenew text end . If the amount awarded to or settled upon multiple claimants exceeds the applicable limit under clause (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h), any party may apply to the district court to apportion to each claimant a proper share of the amount available under the applicable limit under clause (d), (e), (f), or (g). The share apportioned to each claimant shall be in the proportion that the ratio of the award or settlement bears to the aggregate awards and settlements for all claims arising out of the occurrence. The limitation imposed by this subdivision on individual claimants includes damages claimed for loss of services or loss of support arising out of the same tort. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 466.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Limits; punitive damages. (a) Liability of any municipality on any claim within the scope of sections 466.01 to 466.15 shall not exceed: (1) $300,000 when the claim is one for death by wrongful act or omission and $300,000 to any claimant in any other case, for claims arising before January 1, 2008; (2) $400,000 when the claim is one for death by wrongful act or omission and $400,000 to any claimant in any other case, for claims arising on or after January 1, 2008, and before July 1, 2009; (3) $500,000 when the claim is one for death by wrongful act or omission and $500,000 to any claimant in any other case, for claims arising on or after July 1, 2009; (4) $750,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2000; (5) $1,000,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2008; (6) $1,200,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after January 1, 2008, and before July 1, 2009; (7) $1,500,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, for claims arising on or after July 1, 2009; (8) twice the limits provided in clauses (1) to (7) when the claim arises out of the release or threatened release of a hazardous substance, whether the claim is brought under sections 115B.01 to 115B.15 or under any other law; or (9) $1,000,000 for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence, if the claim involves a nonprofit organization engaged in or administering outdoor recreational activities funded in whole or in part by a municipality deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end operating under the authorization of a permit issued by a municipalitynew text begin , or operating pursuant to a no-cost contract with a municipality. For purposes of this subdivision, a "no-cost contract" is a contract between a municipality and a nonprofit organization where the nonprofit organization provides goods or services to the municipality at no cost to the municipalitynew text end . (b) No award for damages on any such claim shall include punitive damages.